Utah statutes.
26-18-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Applicant" means any person who requests assistance under the medical
programs of the state.
(2)  "Client" means a person who the department has determined to be eligible
for assistance under the Medicaid program or the Utah Medical Assistance
Program established under Section 26-18-10.
(3)  "Division" means the Division of Health Care Financing within the
department, established under Section 26-18-2.1.
(4)  "Medicaid program" means the state program for medical assistance for
persons who are eligible under the state plan adopted pursuant to Title XIX of
the federal Social Security Act.
(5)  "Medical or hospital assistance" means services furnished or payments
made to or on behalf of recipients of medical or hospital assistance under
state medical programs.
(6) (a)  "Passenger vehicle" means a self-propelled, two-axle vehicle intended
primarily for operation on highways and used by an applicant or recipient to
meet basic transportation needs and has a fair market value below 40% of the
applicable amount of the federal luxury passenger automobile tax established
in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 4001 and adjusted annually for inflation.
(b)  "Passenger vehicle" does not include:
(i)  a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102;
(ii)  an off-highway vehicle, as defined in Section 41-1a-102; or
(iii)  a motor home, as defined in Section 13-14-102.
(7)  "Recipient" means a person who has received medical or hospital
assistance under the Medicaid program or the Utah Medical Assistance Program
established under Section 26-18-10.
